Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Chapter 4

Tennessee River Four-County Port Authority Act

64-4-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee River Four-County Port Authority Act.”

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 1; T.C.A., §66-4-101.

Compiler's Notes. This chapter is effective in all four counties mentioned, each of which elected to participate by December 31, 1980, in accordance with the provisions of Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 18.

Cross-References. Foreign-Trade Zone Act, title 7, ch. 85.

64-4-102. Legislative findings — Public and governmental character of port authorities — Declaration of public necessity.

It is declared that a clear need exists in rural areas of Tennessee for improved transportation and navigation for the movement and transportation of people, goods and merchandise and for the creation of expanded employment opportunities through the promotion of commerce and industry and with minimal pollution, which require that such rural areas shall have the option of placing the central operation and financing of such rural port and development agencies within rural instrumentalities, and that such instrumentalities have the authority to acquire from the state or other owners real and personal property and to develop, manage and operate the same for economic and industrial development.

It is further declared that port authorities created pursuant to this chapter shall be public and governmental bodies acting as agencies and instrumentalities of the creating and participating counties and that the acquisition, operation, financing and disposal of ports, lands, industrial and other related facilities are declared to be for public and governmental purposes and a matter of public necessity.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 2; T.C.A., §66-4-102.

64-4-103. Authority established — Purposes.

There is established in Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne counties a port authority to be known as the “Tennessee River four-county port authority.”

The port authority shall be established for the purposes of:

Acquiring, constructing, operating and maintaining ports and navigation terminals on the Tennessee River, including docks, wharves, piers, loading and unloading machinery, scales, transportation equipment, harbor and riverfront improvements, storage and transfer facilities, elevators and all other advisable appurtenant port and terminal facilities;

Acquiring, holding, improving and disposing of lands in the vicinity of such ports and terminals that are suitable for the various purposes set forth in this section and for use by manufacturing, processing or fabricating plants or other industries that require access to the waters of the Tennessee River in their operations; and

Acquiring, constructing, operating and maintaining railroads, switchyards, concentration yards, recreation and water sports facilities, roads and bridges, and communication, electric power, gas, water and all other utility facilities, including the aforementioned industrial sites, and to provide that the same shall be under the jurisdiction, control and management of the port authority as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 3; T.C.A., §66-4-103.

64-4-104. Board of commissioners — Meetings — Officers and employees.

The governing power of the authority shall be vested in a board of commissioners composed of three (3) members from each participating county.

Nominees for election to the board shall be presented by the county mayor of each county. The county legislative body shall elect from the nominees presented by majority vote.

Each member shall serve for a term of six (6) years, which shall begin July 1 of the appropriate year; however, in order to provide for staggered terms of the number from such county, the initial members from each county shall be elected one (1) each for a term of two (2), four (4), or six (6) years.

In the event of failure to elect a successor to any member of the board, the member whose term has expired shall continue to serve until that member's successor has been duly elected as provided in this section.

In the event of the death or resignation of a member or the member's inability to serve prior to the expiration of the member's term, such vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term by the county originally electing that member in the same manner as provided in subsection (b).

Any person at least twenty-one (21) years of age who has resided within the boundaries of the county whose legislative body may elect the person for a period of at least one (1) year immediately preceding the person's election is eligible to serve as a member of the board, except that the members of the county legislative body of the participating counties are not eligible to serve as members of the board. Any member who ceases to regularly reside within the boundaries of the county electing that member shall automatically become ineligible to serve in office.

All board members are eligible for reelection; provided, they are qualified as required in this section.

Before entering upon their duties, all board members shall take and subscribe to an oath of office, as provided by the constitution and law for county officers. Copies of the oath of each member shall be filed with the county clerk of that member's respective county.

A majority of the members constitutes a quorum, and the board shall act by vote of a majority present at any meeting attended by a quorum. Vacancies among the board do not affect their power and authority, so long as a quorum remains.

Within thirty (30) days after their election as provided in this section, the board shall hold a meeting to elect a chair who shall be elected on a yearly basis thereafter.

The board shall hold regular meetings at least once every four (4) months and at such regular time and place as the board may, by resolution, determine and may hold such additional meetings, either regular or special, as may be determined by the board of commissioners. Special meetings may be called and held upon such notice and in such manner as the board of commissioners may, by resolution, determine.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, the board of commissioners shall establish their own rules of procedure.

The commissioners shall designate a secretary and a treasurer, or the same individual as secretary-treasurer, and such secretary or treasurer may or may not be a board member. The secretary shall attend all regular and special meetings and keep minutes thereof. The minutes of the meetings shall be available for inspection by the public at the office of the authority at all reasonable times.

The board, by resolution, shall require the treasurer or secretary-treasurer, if one and the same person, to execute a bond with approved corporate surety for the faithful performance of the treasurer's or secretary-treasurer's duties and the accounting of all moneys and revenues that may come into the treasurer's or secretary-treasurer's hands, as such, in such penalty as the board shall specify by resolution. The bonds shall be filed with the secretary of state.

The board, by resolution, may require all other subordinate officers or employees to execute such fidelity bonds for the faithful performance of their duties and the accounting of funds that may come to their hands, in such an amount, with such conditions and such sureties, as the board may determine.

All members of the board shall serve as such without compensation, but they shall be allowed necessary traveling and other expenses while engaged in the business of the authority, as may be provided and approved by the board, payable from the funds of the authority or such funds as may be appropriated by the county legislative bodies of the participating counties.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the members of the board shall be removable only for good cause and after preferment of charges, as provided by law for county officers.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 4; T.C.A., §66-4-104; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Oath of office, Tenn. Const. art. X, § 1; §§8-18-107 —8-18-114.

Removal from office, Tenn. Const. art. VII, § 5; title 8, ch. 47.

64-4-105. Powers and duties of board.

The port authority board of commissioners has the power and is hereby authorized to:

Acquire, construct, purchase, operate, maintain, replace, repair, rebuild, extend and improve, within the boundaries of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne counties, upon first obtaining express permission and authority from the governing body of such county or municipality wherein such facilities are or may be located, the ports and other facilities permitted by this chapter and any and all related facilities, equipment and appurtenances necessary or convenient to the improvement of the access to all channels of commerce, and to make such facilities available to any firm, person, public or private corporation, to any other shipper, consignee or carrier and to charge for their use and for any and all services performed by the authority;

Accept donations to the authority of cash, lands or other property to be used in the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter;

Accept grants, loans or other financial assistance from any federal, state, county or municipal agency or in aid of the acquisition or improvement of any of the facilities provided for in this chapter;

Purchase, rent, lease or otherwise acquire any and all kinds of property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, and whether or not subject to mortgages, liens, charges or other encumbrances, for the counties that, in the judgment of the port authority commissioners, is necessary or convenient to carry out the powers granted in this section. The authority to acquire property includes, but is not limited to, the acquisition of lands in the vicinity of the port and terminal facilities provided for in this section that are suitable for use by industries requiring access to the water of the Tennessee River in their operations, upon first obtaining the express permission and authority from the governing body of such county or municipality where such property is or may be located;

Make contracts and execute instruments containing such covenants, terms and conditions as in the judgment of the board may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of obtaining grants, loans or other financial assistance from any federal or state agency for or in the aid of the acquisition or improvement of the facilities provided for in this chapter;

Make all other contracts and execute all other instruments, including, without limitation, licenses, long or short term leases, mortgages and deeds of trust and other agreements relating to property and facilities under its jurisdiction and the construction, operation, maintenance, repair and improvement thereof, as in the judgment of the board may be necessary, proper or advisable for the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter and the full exercise of the powers granted in this section; and

Carry out and perform the covenants, terms, and conditions of all such contracts or instruments;

Establish schedules of tolls, fees, rates, charges and rentals for the use of the facilities under its jurisdiction and for services that it may render;

Enter upon any lands, waters and premises for the purpose of making surveys, soundings and examination in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of any of the facilities provided for in this chapter;

Promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as the board may deem proper for the orderly administration of the port authority and the efficient operation of its facilities;

Exercise full and exclusive control of and responsibility for the administration of facilities constructed or acquired pursuant to this chapter. The board may lease or license lands or facilities under its jurisdiction for operation by private persons or corporations;

Employ and fix the compensation of such architects, attorneys, engineers, superintendents, consultants, professional advisors and other subordinate officers and employees as may be necessary for the efficient management and operation of the port authority and the operation of the facilities provided for in this chapter and who shall continue in the employment of the authority at the will and pleasure of the board;

Incorporate, operate in all respects and exercise all the powers granted to industrial development corporations under title 7, chapter 53 within the land under the jurisdiction of the port authority granted by this chapter as to any participating county that, by resolution, grants such powers to the port authority. Once any county grants such powers, the board of the port authority shall become the board of directors of the industrial development corporation, notwithstanding § 7-53-301 to the contrary;

Use any property, right-of-way, easement or other similar property right necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of the facilities authorized in this chapter, held by the state or any county or municipality in this state; provided, that such governmental agency shall consent to such use;

Sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any or all of the personal property in the custody and control of the port authority. The commissioners may also, as the agent of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne counties, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any real property in the custody and control of the port authority, except that any land that has been acquired through condemnation proceedings may be sold, transferred, leased or otherwise disposed of only with the approval of the county legislative body of the county containing such property; and any vote as to such approval shall be taken at a meeting duly and regularly called for the purpose of considering the question of the disposition of such property; and

Do all acts and things necessary or deemed necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this chapter.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 5; T.C.A., §66-4-105.

64-4-106. Transfer to authority of interests in land.

Any one (1) of the participating counties, Decatur, Hardin, Perry or Wayne, upon the written recommendation of the port authority commissioners, may acquire any interest in land within the boundaries of the county by gift, purchase or lease and may transfer the interest to the authority by sale, lease or gift. The transfer may be authorized by resolution of the governing body of the county without submission of the question to the voters and without regard to the requirements, restrictions or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 6; T.C.A., §66-4-106; Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 25, provided that the amendment by the act, which amended the first and second sentences and deleted the former last sentence, shall apply only to eminent domain or condemnation proceedings initiated on or after July 1, 2006.

Cross-References. Power and use of eminent domain, title 29, ch. 17, part 1.

64-4-107. Facilities free from outside control — Tax-exempt status — Payments to authority in lieu of ad valorem taxes.

The participating counties, Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne, and the board of commissioners are not required to obtain any certificate of convenience or necessity, franchise, license, permit or other authorization from any bureau, board, commission or other like instrumentality of the state or any political subdivision thereof, in order to acquire, construct, purchase, operate or maintain any of the facilities authorized by this chapter.

Neither the Tennessee public utility commission nor any other board or commission of like character hereafter created has jurisdiction over the port authority with respect to the management and control of the facilities authorized by this chapter, including the establishment of rates, fees and charges or otherwise.

The property and revenues of the authority or any interest therein is exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation.

Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and the income therefrom are exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes.

The exemption from taxation shall not extend to any leasehold or other interest in property of the authority that may be held by any private person or private corporation.

The port authority has the power to negotiate and accept from the authority's lessees payments in lieu of ad valorem taxes. Any such power shall be granted only upon a finding that such payments are deemed to be in furtherance of the authority's public purpose as established by this chapter. The amount of such payments shall not be fixed below the lesser of:

Ad valorem taxes otherwise due and payable by a taxpaying entity upon the current fair market value of the leased properties; or

Ad valorem taxes that were or would have been due and payable on the leased properties for the period immediately preceding the date of their acquisition by the authority.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 7; T.C.A., §66-4-107; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 118; 2017, ch. 94, § 43.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

64-4-108. Powers of participating counties.

The county legislative bodies of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne counties, individually or together, have all necessary powers in order to further the purposes of this chapter. The participating counties are authorized to appropriate to the port authority from their general funds, or such other funds as may be unappropriated, in furtherance of the powers granted by this chapter including, without limitation, the following, any or all of which powers may be exercised by resolution of their governing bodies:

Advance, donate or lend money, raised from any source and by any means, or real or personal property, to the authority;

Provide that any funds on hand or to become available to it for port purposes shall be paid directly to the authority;

Cause water, sewer, gas, electric or other utility services to be provided to the authority;

Open and improve streets, roads and alleys to the port;

Provide police and fire protection services to the port;

Pay the expenses of the port authority board of commissioners or the expenses of operation of any of the facilities authorized by this chapter;

Levy a tax, in addition to all other taxes, upon all taxable property within each county, sufficient to pay the appropriation made by it to the port authority; and

Pledge the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the county as surety to the payment of the authority's bonds.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 8; T.C.A., §66-4-108.

64-4-109. Payment of preliminary expenses by participating counties — Repayment.

A share of all expenses actually incurred by the board of commissioners in the making of surveys, estimates of cost and of revenue, employment of engineers, attorneys or other employees, the giving of notices, taking of options, selling of bonds and all other preliminary expenses of whatever nature that the board deems necessary in connection with or precedent to the acquisition or improvement of any of the facilities provided for in this chapter and that the board deems necessary to be paid prior to the issuance and delivery of the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter may be met and paid out of the general funds of each of the participating counties of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne not otherwise appropriated or from any other fund available, as may be provided by the county legislative body of the counties.

All such payments from the general or other funds shall be considered as temporary, noninterest-bearing loans and shall be repaid immediately upon sale and delivery of the bonds, and claims for such repayment have priority over all other claims against the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 9; T.C.A., §66-4-109.

64-4-110. Bonds.

The port authority has the power to issue negotiable bonds in order to accomplish any of the purposes authorized by this chapter in any of the following manners:

Upon resolution of the board of commissioners, and in the manner provided by this chapter, the port authority may issue bonds of the port authority without the participation of any county; provided, that such bonds are repaid solely from the revenues of the port authority;

Upon resolution of the board of commissioners, requesting one (1) or more counties to participate in the issuance of bonds of the port authority or to issue bonds on behalf of the port authority, such bonds may be issued as provided in this chapter or by law; or

Upon resolution of the board of commissioners, acting in their capacity as an industrial development corporation, the port authority may issue bonds in compliance with title 7, chapter 53.

Any one (1) or more of the participating counties of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne, upon recommendation of the board of commissioners of the port authority, have power and authority to issue and sell their bonds to finance the acquisition, construction, improvement or expansion of the facilities authorized in this chapter and to refund bonds previously issued or refinance indebtedness previously incurred for such purposes. The counties of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne may, in all respects, provide for the rights of the holders of all bonds, including the manner in which future bonds may be issued on a parity with such bonds. The counties of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne shall follow the procedures for the issuance of bonds established in title 9, chapter 21. Prior to the issuance of any general obligation bonds by any county under the authority of this chapter, a referendum shall be held concurrently with a general election in the county. The substance of a resolution adopted pursuant to § 9-21-205 shall be printed on the ballot. In order for the bonds to be issued, three fourths (¾) of the votes cast shall answer the following question affirmatively:

Question: Do you favor the guarantee of the bonds issued pursuant to the above resolution:

For ( )

Against ( )

The ballots shall be counted and returns made and canvassed as provided by law for other elections and the results certified to the secretary of state, who shall publicly proclaim the results.

The bonds to be issued by the port authority shall be authorized by resolution of the county legislative body or bodies of such county or counties and may be issued in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, may mature at such time or times, not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates, may be in such denomination or denominations, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may carry such registration and conversion privileges, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, may be sold or hypothecated in such blocks, may be subject to such terms of redemption with or without premium, may be declared or become due after the maturity date thereof, and may be in such amount as may be provided by resolution of the legislative body of a participating county. Such bonds may be issued for money or property, at public or private sale, for such price and at such rate of interest and may be hypothecated in such manner as the counties may determine; but the interest cost to maturity of the bonds, when issued for property, at the value determined by the counties, which determination shall be conclusive, or the money received for any issue of such bonds shall not exceed the maximum rate fixed by law, payable semiannually. Such bonds shall have all the qualities and incidents of negotiability.

Pending the preparation of the definitive bonds, interim receipts or certificates in such form, and with such provisions, as provided in the resolution authorizing such bonds, may be issued to the purchaser or purchasers of bonds sold pursuant to this chapter. The bonds and interim receipts or certificates shall be fully negotiable.

In case any of the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear on such bonds cease to be officers before the delivery of the bonds, the signatures and countersignatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as though such officers had remained in office until the bonds had been delivered.

The bonds may be issued, notwithstanding and without regard to any limit or restriction on the amount or percentage of indebtedness or of outstanding obligations of the participating counties of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne contained in any other statute, general or special, and notwithstanding and without regard to the requirements of any other general or special statute, including requirements as to elections for the approval of such bonds.

Prior to a vote by the county legislative body of counties authorizing the issuance of bonds to be financed wholly or in part through tax levies by the county legislative body, the board of commissioners shall prepare and submit to the county legislative body of each of the counties of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne a recommendation that bonds in a stated amount be issued under this part, supported by a report on the need for and projected use of the facilities for the financing of which such bond issue is proposed, including a review of alternate solutions, if any, and a justification of the solution proposed.

Bonds may be issued as direct and general obligations of each of the counties of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne payable out of their several and separate general income and revenue. Bonds may also be issued as obligations of the port authority payable out of the revenues of the port authority. In case the bonds are issued as general obligations of the counties, it is the duty of the county legislative body of each of the counties to levy a tax each year, over and above the taxes levied for general county purposes and other special county purposes, to pay the interest and principal of the bonds as they mature. In case the revenues derived from the operation of the facilities provided for in this chapter are sufficient to pay the principal and interest of such bonds, or a part thereof, as they may severally mature, then a special levy for the full payment of such principal and interest shall not be required; but the county legislative bodies shall each year levy an amount of tax, which, when added to the account of revenue derived from the operation of the facilities then on hand and available for that purpose, will be sufficient to pay the principal and interest maturing prior to the collection of the next succeeding tax levy. The bonds shall be sold at public or private sale and in such manner as may be determined by resolution of each of the county legislative bodies authorizing their issuance. The bonds shall contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to and in accordance with this chapter, and such recital shall be conclusive evidence of their legality.

Prior to the adoption by the governing body of the port authority or any one (1) or more of the participating counties of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne of the resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds under this chapter, a plan of financing shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for review; and the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may report thereon to the governing body of the port authority or of the appropriate county or counties within fifteen (15) days from the date the plan is received and shall immediately acknowledge receipt in writing of the proposed financing plan. After receiving the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee or after the expiration of fifteen (15) days from the date the financing plan is received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, whichever date is earlier, the appropriate governing body may take such action with reference to such proposed financing plan as it deems advisable.

In order to secure the payment of any of the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, the interest thereon, or in connection with such bonds, the board of commissioners or the county legislative bodies of Decatur, Hardin, Perry and Wayne counties have power, as to such bonds, to the extent not inconsistent with the mandatory provisions of this chapter, to:

Pledge the full faith and credit of the port authority or county and unlimited taxing power of each of the counties to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds;

Pledge all or any part of the revenue derived from the operation of the facilities authorized in this chapter and to pledge all or any part of the proceeds derived from the sale, transfer, lease or other disposition of any land or other facilities as provided for in this chapter;

Provide for the terms, form, registration, exchange, execution and authentication of such bonds;

Provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds;

Covenant as to the use and disposition of the proceeds from the sale of such bonds;

Covenant as to the rates and charges for the use of facilities of the port authority and for its services;

Redeem such bonds and covenant for their redemption and provide the terms and conditions thereof;

Covenant and prescribe as to what happenings or occurrences shall constitute “events of default,” and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of such bonds shall become or may be declared due, before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

Covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition or obligation;

Vest in a trustee or trustees the right to receive all or any part of the income and revenues pledged and assigned to or for the benefit of the holder or holders of bonds issued under this section and to hold, apply and dispose of the same, and the right to enforce any covenant made to secure or pay, or in relation to the bonds; and to execute and deliver a trust agreement or trust agreements, which may set forth the powers and duties and the remedies available to such trustee or trustees, and limiting the liability thereof, and describing what occurrences shall constitute “events of default,” and prescribing the terms and conditions upon which such trustee or trustees, or the holder or holders of bonds or any specified amount or percentage of such bonds, may exercise such rights and enforce any and all such covenants and resort to such remedies as may be appropriate;

Make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants authorized in this chapter, of like or different character, necessary or advisable to effectuate the purposes of this chapter; and

Execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this section or in the performance of its covenants or duties.

All public officers and bodies of the state, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations, all savings banks and savings institutions, including savings and loan associations, all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees and all other fiduciaries in the state may legally invest funds within their control in bonds issued pursuant to this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow the board of commissioners of the port authority to pledge unilaterally the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of any county as surety to the payment of the authority's bonds or to impose unilaterally an ad valorem tax in any county.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 10; T.C.A., §66-4-110; Acts 1989, ch. 403, § 11; 2010, ch. 868, § 80.

Cross-References. Election results, title 2, ch. 8.

Interest rates allowable, §47-14-103.

64-4-111. Bondholders' rights in event of default.

The county legislative body or the board of commissioners authorizing and issuing bonds has the power, by resolution, to confer upon any holder or holders of a specified amount or percentage of bonds, including a trustee or trustees, for such holders, the rights, in the event of an “event of default,” as defined in such resolution or as may be defined in any agreement with the holder or holders of such bonds, or trustee or trustees thereof:

By suit, action or proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction, to obtain the appointment of a receiver of the authority's facilities, or any part or parts thereof. If such receiver be appointed, the receiver may enter and take possession of such facilities or part or parts thereof, and operate and maintain the same, and collect and receive all revenues thereafter arising therefrom, in the same manner as the authority itself might do, and shall deposit such moneys in a separate account or accounts, and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of the bonds issued under this chapter, as the court may direct; and

By suit, action or proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction, to require the county legislative body authorizing and issuing the bonds, or the board, to act as if such body or board was the trustee of an express trust.

Any such resolution shall constitute a contract between the port authority or county, or both, and the holders of bonds of such issue.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 11; T.C.A., §66-4-111.

64-4-112. Bondholders' rights generally.

Any holder or holders of bonds, including the trustee or trustees for holders of such bonds, have the right, in addition to all other rights:

By mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction, to enforce the rights of the holder or holders of bonds against the county legislative body authorizing and issuing the bonds, the port authority, the board or any other proper officer, agent or employee of any of them, including, but without limitation, the right to require the county legislative body authorizing and issuing the bonds, the port authority, the board, and any proper officer, agent or employee of any of them, to assess, levy and collect taxes; and to fix and collect rates and charges adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, taxes or authority revenues and to require the county legislative body authorizing and issuing the bonds, the port authority, the board, and any officer, agent or employee of them, to carry out any other covenants and agreements, and to perform its and their duties under this chapter; and

By action or suit in equity to enjoin any acts or things, that may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of such holders of bonds.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 12; T.C.A., §66-4-112.

64-4-113. Duties of treasurer.

All moneys derived from the issuance of bonds hereunder, together with any federal or other grant or loan made, for the purposes of this chapter, shall be paid to the treasurer of the port authority.

The treasurer shall deposit such moneys, together with all the receipts from the authority operations, in a separate bank account or accounts, separate from all other county funds, and shall keep adequate records of all such receipts and other sources.

The treasurer shall pay out such moneys only on vouchers signed by such authority officials as the board shall, by resolution, designate to sign such vouchers. No such vouchers for the payment of any such moneys shall be issued except upon the resolution or order of the board, a certified copy of which shall be filed in the office of the treasurer.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 13; T.C.A., §66-4-113.

64-4-114. Application of revenues.

The revenues derived from the operation of the port, storage and transfer facilities and any and all other facilities authorized in this chapter and the proceeds derived from the sale, transfer, lease or other disposition of any land or other facilities shall be applied and used as follows:

The payment of operating expenses of the port authority;

The payment of the interest on the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and the principal of such bonds, as they severally mature, and/or payments into sinking fund reserves for this purpose;

The establishment of necessary reserves for contingencies, depreciation, maintenance, replacement of port, storage and transfer facilities and any and all other facilities or other purposes, as may be required under any bond indenture or as the board may deem necessary or desirable; and

Any revenue or proceeds remaining after all the above items have been provided for shall be held and used for the further development of and for additions to the authority facilities and for the acquisition or construction of new facilities that may become necessary or desirable to further the purposes of this chapter. None of such revenue shall go into the general funds of the participating counties, except as may be directed by the board.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 14; T.C.A., §66-4-114.

64-4-115. Contracts — Force account construction.

Except as otherwise provided, all contracts of the port authority shall be entered into and executed in such manner as may be prescribed by the board of commissioners, but no contract or acquisition by purchase of equipment, apparatus, materials or supplies, involving more than five hundred dollars ($500) or for construction, installation, repair or improvement of the property or facilities under the jurisdiction of the board involving more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be made except after such contract has been advertised for bids, except as provided in subsection (b).

Advertisement for bids is not required:

In the employment of architects, engineers and attorneys or other professional advisors for personal service. The board may employ or select such architects, engineers, attorneys or professional consultants and advisors as in the judgment of the board best meet the qualifications for rendering such services;

When an emergency arises and requires immediate delivery of the supplies or performance of the service; or

For repair, parts, accessories, supplemental equipment or services, or required supplies or services previously furnished or contracted for, in which case such purchase of supplies or procurement of services shall be made in the open market in the manner common among business persons.

After advertisement for bids as provided in this section, if no acceptable bid is received, the board may reject any and all bids, or the board may negotiate with contractors or suppliers to secure the construction of facilities or the purchase of equipment, apparatus, materials or supplies at the best possible price, or the board may construct such facilities, by “force account construction,” that is, the board may employ the necessary engineers, supervisors and other personnel, purchase necessary materials, equipment and supplies, to construct such facilities authorized by this chapter with its own employees.

Acts 1980, ch. 900, § 15; T.C.A., §66-4-115.